scripts/sme2smj-lexeme.xfscript
define H2M  u -> o                   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ (Cns|%^|%_|%') ;
define M2H  o -> u                   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ Cns ;
define hit2dit h -> d || _ [ i t | u s ] [%_|%'|.#.] ;         ! Odd-syll verbs  and dus nouns
define longain2ndsyll a -> á || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Cns* Vow [Cns|[n|s|t]j|t s] _ [ Cns - š ] ;
define tjfromšafter2syll š -> t j || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Syll _ Vow ;
define SamiLetters č -> t j , đ -> d , š -> s j , ŧ -> t , ž -> t j , Č -> T j , Š -> S j ;

define 1stysllæ e a -> æ || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns [Cns Cns [á|å|o|a|u] | (Cns) [o|á]] ;

define 1styslle e a -> e || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns (Cns) [u|a] ;

define 1stsylldiphthong o -> å , O -> Å , e a -> i e , E a -> I e || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns ;

define labialharmony [a|á] -> å || å Cns+ _ ;
define oa2åG1 o a -> å , O a -> Å || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _  [Cns|[n|s|t]j|t s]  a ;

define ddll d d -> l l || Syll Syll [t|h|d] [a|u] _ a t [%_|%'|.#.] ;

echo << and the cleaning rules at the end >>

define phones e7 -> e , o7 -> o ;
define technical %# -> 0 , %^ -> 0 ;

define ierit [ ?* [ {ieret} .x. {ierit} ] ] .P. [ ?* [ {eret} .x. {ierit} ] ] ;
define LoanVerbs [ ierit
 .o. dtj
 .o. ttj
 .o. ssj
 .o. SamiLetters
] ;

echo << Compile... >>

define NonLoans [
    FinalE
 .o. parts
 .o. adjMarkFinalT  ! A_ONLY! 
 .o. adjRemFinalT   ! A_ONLY! 
 .o. adjFinalAt2ak  ! A_ONLY! 
 .o. adjFinalIt2ep  ! A_ONLY! 
 .o. adjCleanFinalT ! A_ONLY! 
 .o. ij    
 .o. dtj
 .o. ttj
 .o. ssj
 .o. LN
 .o. jNN
.o. rd ! the long rule in the beginning
.o. SK2SSK
.o. SKK2SK
.o. sl
.o. zz
.o. z    !not for LOAN conversion
.o. cc   !not for LOAN conversion
.o. c    !not for LOAN conversion
.o. eCns !not for LOAN conversion
!.o. it  ! V_ONLY! 
.o. H2M
.o. M2H
.o. hit2dit
.o. longain2ndsyll
.o. tjfromšafter2syll
.o. SamiLetters
.o. 1stysllæ
.o. 1styslle
.o. 1stsylldiphthong
.o. labialharmony
.o. ddll
.o. oa2åG1
.o. llasj
.o. phones 
.o. jvsuff
.o. finalfoot
!.o. technical
] ;

read regex [
!LoanVerbs .P.  !V_ONLY!
NonLoans
] ;

! Commands for compiling with hfst:
save sme2smj-lexeme.hfst

! Alternative commands for compiling with xfst:
!save sme2smj-lexeme.xfst ;
